Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX e Y 36
SFX e is      is              is        
SFX e is      i               is        
SFX e is      e               is        
SFX e is      a               is        
SFX e is      ibus            is        
SFX e 0       que             is        
SFX e 0       ne              is        
SFX e 0       ve              is        
SFX e is      ique            is        
SFX e is      ine             is        
SFX e is      ive             is        
SFX e is      eque            is        
SFX e is      ene             is        
SFX e is      eve             is        
SFX e is      aque            is        
SFX e is      ane             is        
SFX e is      ave             is        
SFX e is      ibusque         is        
SFX e is      ibusne          is        
SFX e is      ibusve          is        
SFX e is      ium             [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      um              [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      um              [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      um              [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      iumque          [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      iumne           [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      iumve           [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umque           [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umne            [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umve            [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umque           [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umne            [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umve            [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umque           [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umne            [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX e is      umve            [aeiouy][aeiouy]is

SFX d Y 71
SFX d is      is              is        
SFX d is      em              is        
SFX d is      i               is        
SFX d is      e               is        
SFX d is      es              is        
SFX d is      ibus            is        
SFX d 0       que             is        
SFX d 0       ne              is        
SFX d 0       ve              is        
SFX d is      emque           is        
SFX d is      emne            is        
SFX d is      emve            is        
SFX d is      ique            is        
SFX d is      ine             is        
SFX d is      ive             is        
SFX d is      eque            is        
SFX d is      ene             is        
SFX d is      eve             is        
SFX d is      esque           is        
SFX d is      esne            is        
SFX d is      esve            is        
SFX d is      ibusque         is        
SFX d is      ibusne          is        
SFX d is      ibusve          is        
SFX d is      ium             [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      um              [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      um              [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      um              [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      iumque          [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      iumne           [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      iumve           [^aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umque           [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umne            [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umve            [aeiouy][^aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umque           [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umne            [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umve            [^aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umque           [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umne            [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d is      umve            [aeiouy][aeiouy]is
SFX d 0       em              [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       is              [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       i               [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       e               [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       es              [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       um              [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ibus            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       que             [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ne              [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ve              [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       emque           [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       emne            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       emve            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       isque           [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       isne            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       isve            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ique            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ine             [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ive             [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       eque            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ene             [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       eve             [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       esque           [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       esne            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       esve            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       umque           [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       umne            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       umve            [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ibusque         [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ibusne          [^i][^s]  
SFX d 0       ibusve          [^i][^s]  
