Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abscisionis/d
absentis/defg
abundantis/de
accommodatioris/de
accusatoris/d
actoris/d
acuminis/e
adfinitatis/d
administrationis/d
adnotationis/d
adsectatoris/d
adulteris/d
aedilitatis/d
aequalitatis/d
aequitatis/d
aequoris/e
aeris/de
aestimationis/d
Aethiopis/d
aggeris/d
agilioris/de
agitationis/d
agminis/e
alacritatis/d
aleatoris/d
Alisonis/d
alterationis/d
altioris/de
aluminis/e
amaritudinis/d
ambitionis/d
ambitiosioris/de
amentioris/de
amoenitatis/d
amplitudinis/d
ancipitis/defg
angoris/d
animalis/deg
anteambulonis/d
anticipationis/d
antiquioris/de
apicis/d
appellationis/d
appositionis/d
arabis/de
aratoris/d
arcis/d
Arionis/d
artificis/de
ascensionis/d
Asprenatis/d
Atrabatis/d
auctoris/d
Aulidis/d
authoritatis/d
balatronis/d
bellatoris/d
bilancis/de
bipedis/de
bovis/d
cacuminis/e
cadaveris/e
caecitatis/d
caelaminis/e
calamitatis/d
calculationis/d
calliditatis/d
calvioris/de
Calypsonis/d
canoris/d
capacitatis/d
capitis/de
captatricis/d
carcinomatis/e
cardinis/d
carminis/e
carnis/d
caryotidis/d
castoris/d
cataplasmatis/e
cavillationis/d
celebritatis/d
censoris/d
certaminis/e
cervicis/d
characteris/d
ciceris/e
Ciceronis/d
cineris/d
circumductionis/d
citationis/d
citerioris/de
clamoris/d
claudicationis/d
climatis/e
coadunatioris/d
coartationis/d
coemptionis/d
cognitionis/d
cognominis/e
collatoris/d
collocationis/d
combinationis/d
commatis/e
commendationis/d
commentatoris/d
commodioris/de
commotioris/de
communioris/de
compagis/df
competitoris/d
compotationis/d
compotis/de
conceptionis/d
conclusionis/d
concoloris/de
concordis/de
condictionis/d
confectionis/d
confidentis/de
confirmationis/d
confutationis/d
coniunctionis/d
conoidis/d
consensionis/d
consortis/de
constantis/de
constitutionis/d
consul/d
consyderationis/d
contemplatricis/d
contionis/d
contumacis/de
conversationis/d
coordinationis/d
cordis/e
cornicinis/d
corporis/e
corruptionis/d
coturnicis/d
crassitudinis/d
crebrioris/de
credibilioris/de
criminationis/d
criminis/e
cruris/e
cuiatis/d
culminis/e
cunctationis/d
curiosioris/de
curvitatis/d
Cyclopis/d
Davidis/d
deceptionis/d
decoris/de
decurionis/d
dedecoris/e
deductioris/de
definitionis/d
degeneris/de
delectationis/d
delphinis/d
dementis/de
demissioris/de
demonstrationis/d
densitatis/d
derisoris/d
designationis/d
deterioris/de
deversitoris/d
dexteritatis/d
diadematis/e
dicacis/de
dictionis/d
dignationis/d
dignioris/de
dimensionis/d
Diogenis/df
discessionis/d
discoloris/de
discriminis/e
disgregationis/d
disparis/de
disputationis/d
dissimilitudinis/d
dissuasoris/d
Ditis/d
divinationis/d
divisoris/d
divitis/de
dominationis/d
Doridis/d
druidis/d
ductionis/d
duplicationis/d
duplicis/defg
eboris/e
eccentricitatis/d
educatoris/d
egentis/de
egestatis/d
electionis/d
eloquentioris/de
emendationis/d
eminentioris/de
emptoris/d
enclimatis/e
epigrammatis/e
erectionis/d
Euclidis/df
examinis/e
excelsioris/de
exceptionis/d
excussionis/d
exemplaris/e
exercitionis/de
exorbitationis/d
expectationis/d
expertis/defg
explicationis/d
expositoris/d
exsulis/d
exterioris/de
extremitatis/d
facinoris/e
facis/d
falcis/de
fallacis/defg
farciminis/e
farris/e
fatigationis/d
felicitatis/d
fellis/e
femoris/e
fenoris/e
feracis/de
ferventis/de
fictoris/d
fidelioris/de
fidentis/de
fidis/df
filaminis/e
firmioris/de
firmitatis/d
flaminis/de
floris/d
fluminis/e
foederis/e
foedioris/de
fontis/df
foraminis/e
formidinis/d
fortioris/de
fragminis/e
fratris/df
frigoris/de
frondentis/de
frugis/d
fulguris/e
Fullonis/e
fulminis/e
fulsionis/d
funeris/e
furacis/de
furoris/d
gemmatis/e
generis/de
genetricis/d
germinis/e
gestaminis/e
gestationis/d
glutinis/e
Gorgonis/d
graminis/e
grapidis/d
gruis/d
gurgitis/d
gutturis/e
habitudinis/d
Harpocratis/d
Hasdrubalis/d
hebetis/de
Hegionis/d
heredis/d
hiemis/d
hirundinis/d
holeris/e
hominis/d
horrentis/de
humiditatis/d
Hypsiclis/d
iaiunitatis/d
identitatis/d
iecinoris/e
iecoris/e
Ignipotentis/de
imbecillitatis/d
immanitatis/d
immemoris/de
immortalitatis/d
impetis/d
importunioris/de
impossibilitatis/d
impuberis/de
inaequalitatis/d
incolumitatis/d
incudis/d
incumulationis/d
indagationis/d
indignationis/d
inductricis/d
inertis/de
infelicis/de
inferioris/de
infitiatoris/d
ingenuitatis/d
iniquioris/de
iniustioris/de
inmitioris/de
innocentioris/de
innocentis/defg
inquietis/de
inruptionis/d
inscientis/de
insidiatoris/d
insontis/de
institoris/d
intemperantis/de
intercapedinis/d
interfectionis/d
interioris/de
internicionis/d
interrogationis/d
invasionis/d
inventricis/d
Iove/Iemoqv
iridis/d
istantioris/de
itineris/e
iubaris/e
iucunditatis/d
iugeris/e
iunioris/de
iurisdictionis/d
iuris/e
Laconis/d
lactis/e
laetioris/de
Laocoontis/d
laseris/e
lateris/e
laudis/d
lemmatis/e
lenitatis/d
libentis/de
liberatoris/d
Ligonis/d
liminis/de
liquaminis/e
liquoris/d
litoris/de
locupletis/de
lucaris/e
lucubrationis/d
luminis/e
machinatricis/d
maioris/de
malitionis/d
marmoris/e
Mavortis/d
medicaminis/e
melioris/de
mellis/e
memoris/de
mendacis/defgt
militis/d
minoris/de
misericordis/defg
missionis/d
modulaminis/d
motionis/d
multiplicitatis/d
muneris/e
municipis/e
murmuris/e
myriadis/d
nebulonis/d
nectaris/e
neglegentis/de
nemoris/e
nepotis/d
noctis/df
nominis/e
nostratis/de
notioris/de
numerationis/d
numinis/e
obligationis/d
obsidionis/d
occupationis/d
oleris/e
ominis/e
omnipotentis/de
oneris/e
operationis/d
operis/e
opimioris/de
oppugnationis/d
ordinationis/d
ordinatioris/de
oris/e
ossis/e
ostentatoris/d
paludis/d
papaveris/de
parcioris/de
parvitatis/d
pauperis/de
pecoris/e
pectoris/e
pecudis/d
pegmatis/e
peioris/de
perduellionis/d
periurioris/de
pernicitatis/d
pervicacis/de
petitionis/d
petulantis/defg
Phraatis/d
pignoris/e
piperis/e
pixidis/d
plasmatis/e
pluris/efg
Polemonis/d
ponderis/e
populatoris/d
potationis/d
potioris/de
praecipitis/defg
praegnationis/d
praesentis/defg
praesulis/d
principis/de
prioris/de
prismatis/e
probitatis/d
problematis/e
procerioris/de
proditionis/d
progressionis/d
pronominis/e
propioris/de
proregis/d
puberis/de
pugillaris/df
pusillioris/de
putaminis/de
putealis/e
quadrupedis/de
quadruplicis/de
quaestionis/d
quotientis/d
receptionis/d
rectitudinis/d
reducis/de
reflexionis/d
regiminis/e
regnatricis/de
remigis/d
remissioris/de
repetitionis/d
resegminis/e
retrogradationis/d
rhetoris/de
rigoris/d
roboris/de
rotationis/d
ruris/e
sacomatis/e
Saliaris/efgq
salis/d
sanctitatis/d
satoris/d
sceleris/e
schematis/e
sectionis/d
seminis/e
semissis/d
senis/deq
septembris/d
sequioperis/e
siccitatis/d
sideris/e
simultatis/d
solaminis/e
solemnitatis/d
solertis/de
sonacis/de
sonoritatis/d
sontis/de
sophismatis/de
sospitis/de
spadonis/d
speciminis/e
squaloris/d
staminis/e
stercoris/e
stridoris/d
successionis/d
sulphuris/e
sulpuris/e
suminis/e
superationis/d
superioris/de
superurgentis/de
supplicis/de
Syphacis/d
systematis/e
tegiminis/e
tegminis/e
tegoris/e
telluris/de
temporis/e
temptaminis/e
tenacitatis/d
teretis/de
tergoris/e
Tethyis/d
theorematis/e
tigridis/d
Tonnantis/de
tractationis/d
translationis/d
trementis/de
tricorporis/de
trieteridis/d
triplicis/defgt
trucis/de
turis/e
turturis/d
uberis/e
ulterioris/de
ultoris/d
ultricis/de
urbanitatis/d
uxoris/d
varietatis/d
vasis/eq
velaminis/e
velleris/e
venationis/d
verberis/e
verberonis/d
veris/e
vesperis/d
victricis/de
vigilis/de
viminis/e
viriditatis/d
visceris/e
volneris/e
volucris/defq
voluminis/e
voluptatis/d
vulneris/e
Zeuxidis/d
